Washington statutes.
RCW 43.113.010

Commission created.

The Washington state commission on African American affairs is created. The commission shall be administered by an executive director, who shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the governor. The governor shall set the salary of the executive director. The executive director shall employ the staff of the commission.

[ 1992 c 96 s 2.]